Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1870 Y 27
SFX 1870 teti teti
SFX 1870 teti tem
SFX 1870 teti tiš
SFX 1870 teti ti
SFX 1870 teti timo
SFX 1870 teti tite
SFX 1870 teti te
SFX 1870 teti tio
SFX 1870 teti tila
SFX 1870 teti tilo
SFX 1870 teti tili
SFX 1870 teti tile
SFX 1870 teti tiću
SFX 1870 teti tićeš
SFX 1870 teti tiće
SFX 1870 teti tićemo
SFX 1870 teti tićete
SFX 1870 teti tiće
SFX 1870 teti ti
SFX 1870 teti timo
SFX 1870 teti tite
SFX 1870 teti teh
SFX 1870 teti teše
SFX 1870 teti tesmo
SFX 1870 teti teste
SFX 1870 teti ćahu
SFX 1870 teti teći

SFX 1871 Y 28
SFX 1871 teti teti
SFX 1871 teti oću
SFX 1871 teti oćeš
SFX 1871 teti oće
SFX 1871 teti oćemo
SFX 1871 teti oćete
SFX 1871 teti oće
SFX 1871 teti teo
SFX 1871 teti tela
SFX 1871 teti telo
SFX 1871 teti teli
SFX 1871 teti tele
SFX 1871 teti teću
SFX 1871 teti tećeš
SFX 1871 teti teće
SFX 1871 teti tećemo
SFX 1871 teti tećete
SFX 1871 teti teće
SFX 1871 teti tej
SFX 1871 teti tejmo
SFX 1871 teti tejte
SFX 1871 teti tedoh
SFX 1871 teti tede
SFX 1871 teti tedosmo
SFX 1871 teti tedoste
SFX 1871 teti tedoše
SFX 1871 teti oteći
SFX 1871 teti tevši

SFX 1872 Y 27
SFX 1872 tjeti tjeti
SFX 1872 tjeti oću
SFX 1872 tjeti oćeš
SFX 1872 tjeti oće
SFX 1872 tjeti oćemo
SFX 1872 tjeti oćete
SFX 1872 tjeti oće
SFX 1872 tjeti tio
SFX 1872 tjeti tjela
SFX 1872 tjeti tjelo
SFX 1872 tjeti tjeli
SFX 1872 tjeti tjele
SFX 1872 tjeti tjeću
SFX 1872 tjeti tjećeš
SFX 1872 tjeti tjeće
SFX 1872 tjeti tjećemo
SFX 1872 tjeti tjećete
SFX 1872 tjeti tjeće
SFX 1872 tjeti tjedni
SFX 1872 tjeti tjednimo
SFX 1872 tjeti tjednite
SFX 1872 tjeti tjedoh
SFX 1872 tjeti tjedoše
SFX 1872 tjeti tjedosmo
SFX 1872 tjeti tjedoste
SFX 1872 tjeti oćahu
SFX 1872 tjeti tjeći

SFX 1873 Y 28
SFX 1873 asti asti
SFX 1873 asti atem
SFX 1873 asti ateš
SFX 1873 asti ate
SFX 1873 asti atemo
SFX 1873 asti atete
SFX 1873 asti atu
SFX 1873 asti ao
SFX 1873 asti ala
SFX 1873 asti alo
SFX 1873 asti ali
SFX 1873 asti ale
SFX 1873 asti ašću
SFX 1873 asti ašćeš
SFX 1873 asti ašće
SFX 1873 asti ašćemo
SFX 1873 asti ašćete
SFX 1873 asti ašće
SFX 1873 asti ati
SFX 1873 asti atimo
SFX 1873 asti atite
SFX 1873 asti ah
SFX 1873 asti ate
SFX 1873 asti aše
SFX 1873 asti asmo
SFX 1873 asti aste
SFX 1873 asti ahu
SFX 1873 asti ući

SFX 1874 Y 27
SFX 1874 eti eti
SFX 1874 eti em
SFX 1874 eti eš
SFX 1874 eti e
SFX 1874 eti emo
SFX 1874 eti ete
SFX 1874 eti e
SFX 1874 eti eo
SFX 1874 eti ela
SFX 1874 eti elo
SFX 1874 eti eli
SFX 1874 eti ele
SFX 1874 eti eću
SFX 1874 eti ećeš
SFX 1874 eti eće
SFX 1874 eti ećemo
SFX 1874 eti ećete
SFX 1874 eti eće
SFX 1874 eti i
SFX 1874 eti imo
SFX 1874 eti ite
SFX 1874 eti eh
SFX 1874 eti eše
SFX 1874 eti esmo
SFX 1874 eti este
SFX 1874 eti ahu
SFX 1874 eti eći

SFX 1875 Y 28
SFX 1875 sti sti
SFX 1875 sti em
SFX 1875 sti eš
SFX 1875 sti e
SFX 1875 sti emo
SFX 1875 sti ete
SFX 1875 sti u
SFX 1875 sti ao
SFX 1875 sti la
SFX 1875 sti lo
SFX 1875 sti li
SFX 1875 sti le
SFX 1875 sti eću
SFX 1875 sti ećeš
SFX 1875 sti eće
SFX 1875 sti ećemo
SFX 1875 sti ećete
SFX 1875 sti eće
SFX 1875 sti i
SFX 1875 sti imo
SFX 1875 sti ite
SFX 1875 sti eh
SFX 1875 sti e
SFX 1875 sti eše
SFX 1875 sti esmo
SFX 1875 sti este
SFX 1875 sti ahu
SFX 1875 sti eći

SFX 1876 Y 29
SFX 1876 uti uti
SFX 1876 uti ujem
SFX 1876 uti uješ
SFX 1876 uti uje
SFX 1876 uti ujemo
SFX 1876 uti ujete
SFX 1876 uti uju
SFX 1876 uti uo
SFX 1876 uti ula
SFX 1876 uti ulo
SFX 1876 uti uli
SFX 1876 uti ule
SFX 1876 uti uću
SFX 1876 uti ućeš
SFX 1876 uti uće
SFX 1876 uti ućemo
SFX 1876 uti ućete
SFX 1876 uti uće
SFX 1876 uti uj
SFX 1876 uti ujmo
SFX 1876 uti ujte
SFX 1876 uti uh
SFX 1876 uti u
SFX 1876 uti uše
SFX 1876 uti usmo
SFX 1876 uti uste
SFX 1876 uti uhu
SFX 1876 uti ući
SFX 1876 uti uvši

SFX 1877 Y 27
SFX 1877 ati ati
SFX 1877 ati im
SFX 1877 ati iš
SFX 1877 ati i
SFX 1877 ati imo
SFX 1877 ati ite
SFX 1877 ati a
SFX 1877 ati ao
SFX 1877 ati ala
SFX 1877 ati alo
SFX 1877 ati ali
SFX 1877 ati ale
SFX 1877 ati aću
SFX 1877 ati aćeš
SFX 1877 ati aće
SFX 1877 ati aćemo
SFX 1877 ati aćete
SFX 1877 ati aće
SFX 1877 ati i
SFX 1877 ati imo
SFX 1877 ati ite
SFX 1877 ati ah
SFX 1877 ati aše
SFX 1877 ati asmo
SFX 1877 ati aste
SFX 1877 ati ahu
SFX 1877 ati eći

SFX 1878 Y 10
SFX 1878 em em
SFX 1878 em eš
SFX 1878 em e
SFX 1878 em emo
SFX 1878 em ete
SFX 1878 em u
SFX 1878 em i
SFX 1878 em imo
SFX 1878 em ite
SFX 1878 em ući

SFX 1879 Y 13
SFX 1879 i i
SFX 1879 i og
SFX 1879 i om
SFX 1879 i ome
SFX 1879 i oga
SFX 1879 i ih
SFX 1879 i im
SFX 1879 i ima
SFX 1879 i a
SFX 1879 i e
SFX 1879 i oj
SFX 1879 i u
SFX 1879 i o

SFX 1880 Y 13
SFX 1880 i i
SFX 1880 i eg
SFX 1880 i em
SFX 1880 i emu
SFX 1880 i ega
SFX 1880 i ih
SFX 1880 i im
SFX 1880 i ima
SFX 1880 i a
SFX 1880 i e
SFX 1880 i oj
SFX 1880 i u
SFX 1880 i om

SFX 1881 Y 5
SFX 1881 a a
SFX 1881 a e
SFX 1881 a i
SFX 1881 a u
SFX 1881 a om

SFX 1882 Y 9
SFX 1882 i i
SFX 1882 i ih
SFX 1882 i im
SFX 1882 i ima
SFX 1882 i a
SFX 1882 i e
SFX 1882 i oj
SFX 1882 i u
SFX 1882 i o

SFX 1883 Y 5
SFX 1883 tak tak
SFX 1883 tak ci
SFX 1883 tak taka
SFX 1883 tak cima
SFX 1883 tak tke

SFX 1884 Y 13
SFX 1884 k ka
SFX 1884 k ke
SFX 1884 k ki
SFX 1884 k kim
SFX 1884 k kima
SFX 1884 k kih
SFX 1884 k ko
SFX 1884 k kog
SFX 1884 k koga
SFX 1884 k koj
SFX 1884 k kom
SFX 1884 k kome
SFX 1884 k ku

SFX 1885 Y 13
SFX 1885 š ša
SFX 1885 š še
SFX 1885 š šeg
SFX 1885 š šega
SFX 1885 š šem
SFX 1885 š šemu
SFX 1885 š ši
SFX 1885 š šim
SFX 1885 š šima
SFX 1885 š ših
SFX 1885 š šoj
SFX 1885 š šom
SFX 1885 š šu

SFX 1886 Y 4
SFX 1886 i i
SFX 1886 i as
SFX 1886 i am
SFX 1886 i ama

SFX 1887 Y 7
SFX 1887 o o
SFX 1887 o og
SFX 1887 o oga
SFX 1887 o om
SFX 1887 o ome
SFX 1887 o im
SFX 1887 o ime

SFX 1888 Y 5
SFX 1888 eg ega
SFX 1888 eg em
SFX 1888 eg emu
SFX 1888 eg im
SFX 1888 eg ime

SFX 1889 Y 2
SFX 1889 a a
SFX 1889 a o

SFX 1890 Y 6
SFX 1890 ene ene
SFX 1890 ene e
SFX 1890 ene eni
SFX 1890 ene i
SFX 1890 ene nom
SFX 1890 ene nome

SFX 1891 Y 18
SFX 1891 j j
SFX 1891 j ja
SFX 1891 j je
SFX 1891 j jeg
SFX 1891 j jega
SFX 1891 j g
SFX 1891 j ga
SFX 1891 j jem
SFX 1891 j jemu
SFX 1891 j m
SFX 1891 j me
SFX 1891 j ji
SFX 1891 j jim
SFX 1891 j jima
SFX 1891 j jih
SFX 1891 j joj
SFX 1891 j jom
SFX 1891 j ju

SFX 1892 Y 3
SFX 1892 s s
SFX 1892 s m
SFX 1892 s ma

SFX 1893 Y 14
SFX 1893 an an
SFX 1893 an na
SFX 1893 an ne
SFX 1893 an ni
SFX 1893 an nim
SFX 1893 an nima
SFX 1893 an nih
SFX 1893 an no
SFX 1893 an nog
SFX 1893 an noga
SFX 1893 an noj
SFX 1893 an nom
SFX 1893 an nome
SFX 1893 an nu

SFX 1894 Y 5
SFX 1894 e e
SFX 1894 e oj
SFX 1894 e u
SFX 1894 e om
SFX 1894 e ome

SFX 1895 Y 4
SFX 1895 ega ega
SFX 1895 ega emu
SFX 1895 ega im
SFX 1895 ega ime

SFX 1896 Y 13
SFX 1896 v va
SFX 1896 v ve
SFX 1896 v vi
SFX 1896 v vim
SFX 1896 v vima
SFX 1896 v vih
SFX 1896 v vo
SFX 1896 v vog
SFX 1896 v voga
SFX 1896 v voj
SFX 1896 v vom
SFX 1896 v vome
SFX 1896 v vu

SFX 1897 Y 13
SFX 1897 n na
SFX 1897 n ne
SFX 1897 n ni
SFX 1897 n nim
SFX 1897 n nima
SFX 1897 n nih
SFX 1897 n no
SFX 1897 n nog
SFX 1897 n noga
SFX 1897 n noj
SFX 1897 n nom
SFX 1897 n nome
SFX 1897 n nu

SFX 1898 Y 2
SFX 1898 h h
SFX 1898 h ma

SFX 1899 Y 15
SFX 1899 aj a
SFX 1899 aj aj
SFX 1899 aj e
SFX 1899 aj i
SFX 1899 aj im
SFX 1899 aj ima
SFX 1899 aj ime
SFX 1899 aj ih
SFX 1899 aj o
SFX 1899 aj og
SFX 1899 aj oga
SFX 1899 aj oj
SFX 1899 aj om
SFX 1899 aj ome
SFX 1899 aj u

SFX 1900 Y 15
SFX 1900 av av
SFX 1900 av va
SFX 1900 av ve
SFX 1900 av vi
SFX 1900 av vim
SFX 1900 av vime
SFX 1900 av vima
SFX 1900 av vih
SFX 1900 av vo
SFX 1900 av vog
SFX 1900 av voga
SFX 1900 av voj
SFX 1900 av vom
SFX 1900 av vome
SFX 1900 av vu

SFX 1901 Y 5
SFX 1901 e e
SFX 1901 e eg
SFX 1901 e ega
SFX 1901 e emu
SFX 1901 e im

SFX 1902 Y 5
SFX 1902 ebe ebe
SFX 1902 ebe e
SFX 1902 ebe ebi
SFX 1902 ebe i
SFX 1902 ebe obom

SFX 1903 Y 5
SFX 1903 i i
SFX 1903 i e
SFX 1903 i ebe
SFX 1903 i ebi
SFX 1903 i obom

PFX 19 Y 1
PFX 19 0 ne

PFX 989 Y 1
PFX 989 0 naj
