Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.dic
analitički/745,19
aromatični/988,989
baždarenje/6,19
bezizgledni/988,989
bespokojni/988,989
bludni/988,989
bogoslužben/747,19
buljav/991,989
vaskolik/1884
vaš/1885
vezanje/6,19
vi/1886
vitalni/988,989
vlasnik/5,19
gdeko/1887
gdečeg/1888
gdešta/1889
gdjeko/1887
gdječeg/1888
gdješta/1889
glamurozni/988,989
gledanost/9,19
grozni/988,989
dvadesetdeveti/1879
dvadeseti/1879
dvadesetpeti/1879
dvadesetsedmi/1879
dvadesettreći/1880
dvadesetšesti/1879
dvestahiljaditi/1879
dvestotiniti/1879
dvijehiljaditi/1879
dvjestoti/1879
dvojica/1881
dvoličnost/9,19
devedesetdeveti/1879
devedeseti/1879
devedesetpeti/1879
devedesetsedmi/1879
devedesettreći/1880
devedesetšesti/1879
devetnaesti/1879
devetori/1882
devetorica/1881
devetstoti/1879
desetak/1883
desetomilioniti/1879
desetori/1882
desetorica/1881
desethiljaditi/1879
decentralizovan/990,989
dešavanje/6,19
dobivanje/6,19
domeren/747,19
dohvat/18,19
dražestan/993,989
ekskluzivni/746,19
ekskluzivni/988,989
eufemistički/745,19
živahni/988,989
zagrižen/747,19
zaljubljivanje/6,19
zaplašen/990,989
zapostavljanje/6,19
zahvatljiv/749,19
zilioniti/1879
iglast/992,989
igrač/50,19
izvršavanje/6,19
izminiran/747,19
iko/1887
imenovan/747,19
impresioniran/990,989
interaktivnost/9,19
islikan/747,19
ispucao/1004,989
istorijski/745,19
ičeg/1888
išta/1889
jeđenje/6,19
kvadrilioniti/1879
kvantitativni/746,19
ko/1887
kojeko/1887
koječeg/1888
koješta/1889
koketni/988,989
komplementarnost/9,19
kontroverzni/746,19
kuždrav/991,989
liberalnost/9,19
marginalizovan/990,989
mene/1890
mikrohirurški/745,19
milijarditi/1879
moj/1891
nabijen/990,989
nadjeven/747,19
nas/1892
naturen/747,19
natušten/990,989
neverni/988,989
nedopadljiv/991,989
nezamašćen/990,989
neizgrađen/990,989
neisplativ/991,989
neko/1887
nekorozivni/988,989
nemučni/988,989
neobuzet/992,989
neosmehnut/992,989
nepodudaran/990,989
nepravoverni/988,989
neprogonjen/990,989
nerazobličen/990,989
nesamodovoljni/988,989
nespasonosni/988,989
neubitačni/988,989
neupotrebljavan/990,989
nečeg/1888
nečitljiv/991,989
nešta/1889
nijedan/1893
niko/1887
ničeg/1888
ništa/1889
nje/1894
njega/1895
njegov/1896
njezin/1897
njen/1897
njin/1897
njih/1898
njihov/1896
obadvojica/1881
obojica/1881
obuhvativost/9,19
ovaj/1899
održiv/991,989
označen/747,19
onaj/1899
ophodnost/9,19
osamdesetdeveti/1879
osamdeseti/1879
osamdesetpeti/1879
osamdesetsedmi/1879
osamdesettreći/1880
osamdesetšesti/1879
osamstoti/1879
osmomilioniti/1879
osmori/1882
osmorica/1881
ospičav/991,989
otpravljen/747,19
pedesetdrugi/1879
pedesetosmi/1879
pedesetpeti/1879
pedesetsedmi/1879
pedesettreći/1880
pedesetšesti/1879
petnaesti/1879
petori/1882
petorica/1881
petstoti/1879
pitomost/9,19
plaćen/990,989
pogdeko/1887
pogdečeg/1888
pogdešta/1889
pogdjeko/1887
pođubren/747,19
poletni/988,989
poneko/1887
ponečeg/1888
ponešta/1889
popularnost/9,19
pošumljen/990,989
pravedni/746,19
prepisan/747,19
priljepčiv/991,989
primećen/747,19
prokrčen/747,19
prostrt/992,989
pušenje/6,19
razočaran/990,989
razrušen/747,19
redukujući/750,19
repat/992,989
sav/1900
savršenost/9,19
svako/1887
svačeg/1888
svašta/1889
sve/1901
svetlucav/991,989
svoj/1891
sebe/1902
sedamdesetdeveti/1879
sedamdeseti/1879
sedamdesetpeti/1879
sedamdesetsedmi/1879
sedamdesettreći/1880
sedamdesetšesti/1879
sedamstoti/1879
sedmomilioniti/1879
sedmori/1882
sedmorica/1881
senčen/747,19
slojevit/992,989
smislenost/9,19
stasan/747,19
stvarni/988,989
stoti/1879
stohiljaditi/1879
taj/1899
tvoj/1891
tematizovan/747,19
tesni/995,989
ti/1903
treći/1880
tridesetdrugi/1879
tridesetosmi/1879
tridesettreći/1880
tridesetčetvrti/1879
trinaesti/1879
trihiljaditi/1879
trojica/1881
uvjerljivost/9,19
uglancan/990,989
ulučen/747,19
upleten/990,989
uremični/746,19
familijarni/746,19
fleksibilni/988,989
hiteti/1870
hteti/1871
htjeti/1872
cvasti/1873
cvateti/1874
cvetnica/25,19
crpsti/1875
čeg/1888
četvori/1882
četvorica/1881
četvrti/1879
četrdeseti/1879
četrdesetsedmi/1879
četrdesettreći/1880
čudni/988,989
čuti/1876
džedžati/1877
šaljem/1878
šezdesetdeveti/1879
šezdesetpeti/1879
šezdesettreći/1880
šezdesetšesti/1879
šesti/1879
šestori/1882
šestorica/1881
šeststoti/1879
šta/1889
štočeg/1888
štošta/1889
